Montana, session 2025, HB154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Housing fairness property tax credit -- definitions. As used in
[sections 1 through 4], the following definitions apply:
(1) "Claim period" means the tax year for claimants required to file a Montana tax return or returns
under chapter 30 of this title and the calendar year for claimants not required to file returns.
(2) "Claimant" means a person who is eligible to file a claim for a credit under [sections 1 through
4].
(3) "Gross rent" means the total rent in cash or its equivalent actually paid during the claim period
by the renter or lessee for the right of occupancy of the qualified rental residence pursuant to an arm's-length
transaction with the landlord.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 154

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0154.2
(4) (a) "Household" means an association of persons who live in the same dwelling, sharing its
furnishings, facilities, accommodations, and expenses.
(b) The term does not include bona fide lessees, tenants, or roomers and boarders on contract.
(5) "Household income" means all income received by all persons of a household in a tax year
while they are members of the household.
(6) (a) "Income" means, except as provided in subsection (6)(b), federal adjusted gross income,
without regard to loss, as that quantity is defined in the Internal Revenue Code, plus all nontaxable income,
including but not limited to:
(i) the amount of any pension or annuity, including Railroad Retirement Act benefits and veterans'
disability benefits;
(ii) the amount of capital gains excluded from adjusted gross income;
(iii) alimony;
(iv) support money;
(v) nontaxable strike benefits;
(vi) cash public assistance and relief;
(vii) interest on federal, state, county, and municipal bonds; and
(viii) all payments received under federal social security, except social security income paid directly
to a nursing home.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (6), income is reduced by the taxpayer's basis.
(7) "Property tax billed" means taxes levied against the qualified residence, including special
assessments and fees but excluding penalties or interest during the claim period.
(8) (a) (i) "Qualified rental residence" means any class four residential dwelling that is a single-
family dwelling unit, unit of a multiple-unit dwelling, trailer, manufactured home, or mobile home that is rented
from a third party, located in Montana, and subject to property taxes and as much of the surrounding land, not
exceeding 1 acre, as is reasonably necessary for its use as a dwelling.
(ii) The term includes a single-family dwelling unit or unit of a multiple-unit dwelling that is rented
from a county or municipal housing authority as provided in Title 7, chapter 15.
(b) Except for dwellings rented from a county or municipal housing authority, the term does not
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 154

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0154.2
include rented dwellings or rented lands that are not subject to Montana property taxes during the claim period.
(9) "Qualified residence" means any owner-occupied class four residential dwelling that is a single-
family dwelling unit, unit of a multiple-unit dwelling, trailer, manufactured home, or mobile home located in
Montana that is subject to property taxes and as much of the surrounding land, not exceeding 1 acre, as is
reasonably necessary for its use as a dwelling.
(10) "Rent-equivalent property tax paid" means 15% of gross rent.
(11) "Tax year" means the property tax year preceding the current year in which a claim for a
housing fairness property tax credit is made.
(12) "Threshold amount" means the amount determined based on household income as follows:
(a) on the first $20,000 of household income, 1%;
(b) on $20,001 to $40,000 of household income, 2.5%;
(c) on $40,001 to $60,000 of household income, 3.5%;
(d) on $60,001 to $80,000 of household income, 5.5%;
(e) on $80,001 to $100,000 of household income, 7.5%; and
(f) on household income above $100,000, 9.5%.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Housing fairness property tax credit -- eligibility. (1) In order to make
a claim for a credit under [sections 1 through 4], the individual must have:
(a) resided in Montana for at least 9 months of the tax year for which the claim is made;
(b) occupied one or more qualified residences as an owner or one or more qualified rental
residences as a renter or lessee for at least 6 7 months of the tax year; and
(c) a household income of less than $150,000.
(2) A person is not disqualified from claiming the credit under [sections 1 through 4] because of a
change of residence during the claim period if the person occupies a qualified residence as an owner or a
qualified rental residence as a renter or lessee in Montana for at least 7 months during the claim period.
(3) A taxpayer may not claim the credit provided for in [sections 1 through 4] and the residential
property tax credit for the elderly provided for in 15-30-2337 through 15-30-2341.
(4) Except as provided in [section 3(4)], only one claim for a housing fairness property tax credit or
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 154

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0154.2
a residential property tax credit for the elderly provided for in 15-30-2337 through 15-30-2341 may be made
with respect to any qualified residence.
(5) A claim for the credit may not be allowed for any portion of property tax billed or rent-equivalent
property tax paid that is derived from a public tax subsidy program or a public rent subsidy program.
(6) A claim is disallowed if the department finds that the claimant received title to the claimant's
qualified residence primarily for the purpose of receiving benefits under [sections 1 through 4].
(7) When the landlord and tenant have not dealt at arm's length and the department judges the
gross rent charged to be excessive, the department may adjust the amount considered gross rent to a
reasonable amount.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Housing fairness property tax credit -- credit amount. (1) There is a
credit against the taxes imposed by this chapter for a portion of property tax billed or rent-equivalent property
tax paid by a claimant in the tax year as provided in this section.
(2) The amount of the credit allowed under this section is equal to the property tax billed or rent-
equivalent property tax paid in the tax year times 0.75 minus the threshold amount.
(3) If the amount determined is equal to or less than zero, there is no credit.
(4) If two or more individuals share a qualified rental residence, each individual may claim the
credit based on the proportional share that the individual pays of the gross rent.
(5) If the amount of the credit exceeds the claimant's liability under this chapter, the amount of the
excess must be refunded to the claimant. The credit may be claimed even though the claimant has no taxable
income under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Housing fairness property tax credit -- filing date -- denial of claim.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3), a claim for the credit must be submitted at the same time the
claimant's tax return is due under chapter 30 of this title. For an individual not required to file a tax return, the
claim must be submitted on or before April 15 of the year following the year for which the credit is sought.
(2) A receipt showing property taxes billed or gross rent paid must be filed with each claim. Each
claimant shall, at the request of the department, supply all additional information necessary to support a claim.
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 154

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0154.2
(3) The department may grant a reasonable extension for filing a claim whenever, in its judgment,
good cause exists.
(4) If an individual who would have a claim under [sections 1 through 4] dies before filing the claim,
the personal representative of the estate of the decedent may file the claim.
(5) The department or an individual may revise a return and make a claim under [sections 1
through 4] within 3 years from the last day prescribed for filing a claim for relief.
(6) A person filing a false or fraudulent claim under the provisions of [sections 1 through 4] must be
charged with the offense of unsworn falsification to authorities pursuant to 45-7-203. If a false or fraudulent
claim has been paid, the amount paid, penalties, and interest may be recovered as provided in 15-1-216.

Section 5. Section 15-6-240, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-6-240. Intangible land value property exemption -- application procedure. (1) There is an
intangible land value assistance program that provides graduated levels of property tax exemptions to assist
owners of primary residences with land values that are disproportionate to the value of a primary residence and
improvements. To be eligible for the exemption, applicants must meet the requirements of this section.
(2) If the total appraised value of the land is equal to or less than 150% of the appraised value of
the primary residence and improvements situated on the land, then the land exemption provided in this section
does not apply.
(3) Subject to subsection (6) (7), if the total appraised value of the land is greater than 150% of the
appraised value of the primary residence and improvements situated on the land, then the land is valued at
150% of the appraised value of the primary residence and improvements situated on the land, subject to the
minimum equalization of value requirement in subsection (4), and the remainder of the land value is exempt
from taxation.
(4) If the calculation in subsection (3) creates a land value that is less than the statewide average
value of land, then the value of the land may not be reduced in an amount that is less than the statewide
average value of land multiplied by the acreage of land for the subject property.
(5) This section does not provide an exemption for the primary residence and improvements
situated on the land.
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 154

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0154.2
(6) Property eligible for the exemption provided for in this section is not eligible for the property tax
assistance programs provided for in Title 15, chapter 6, part 3.
(6)(7) (a) A claim for assistance must be filed on a form provided by the department within 30 days
from the date on the classification and appraisal notice, as provided for in 15-7-102, for the exemption to be
considered for both years of the 2-year valuation cycle provided for in 15-7-111. An application made more than
30 days from the date of the classification and appraisal notice will be applicable only for the second year of the
2-year valuation cycle. After an exemption is approved, the applicant remains eligible for the exemption for the
remainder of the 2-year valuation cycle as long as the property is continually used as a primary residence by
the applicant. An applicant who does not apply for assistance during the first year of the valuation cycle may
apply no later than March 1 of the second year of the cycle.
(b) The application form must contain:
(i) an affirmation that the applicant owns and maintains the land and improvements as the primary
residence;
(ii) an affirmation that the land has been owned by the applicant or a family member of the
applicant within the third degree of consanguinity for at least 30 consecutive years; and
(iii) any other information required by the department that is relevant to the applicant's eligibility.
(c) When providing information to the department for qualification under this section, applicants are
subject to the false swearing penalties established in 45-7-202.
(d) The department may investigate the information provided in an application and an applicant's
continued eligibility.
(e) The department may request applicant verification of the primary residence.
(7)(8) As used in this section the following definitions apply:
(a) "Land" means:
(i) parcels of land or lots of not more than 5 acres under single ownership that support the primary
residential improvements. The term does not include parcels of land or lots that do not support the primary
residential improvements, regardless of whether those parcels or lots are contiguous with or adjacent to the
primary residential property.
(ii) subject to the limitations in subsection (7)(a)(i) (8)(a)(i), separately assessed land on which a
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 154

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0154.2
mobile or manufactured home is located, but only if the mobile or manufactured home and the land are both
owned by the applicant.
(b) "Primary residence" means a single-family dwelling:
(i) in which an applicant can demonstrate the applicant lived for at least 7 months of the year for
which benefits are claimed;
(ii) that is the only residence for which the land exemption claimed in this section is claimed by the
applicant; and
(iii) that is owned or under contract for deed by the applicant.
(c) "Single-family dwelling" means a residential dwelling, manufactured home, trailer, or mobile
home. The term does not include a condominium unit or a unit of a multiple-unit dwelling.
(d) "Statewide average value of land" is a value calculated by the department that is equal to the
statewide average market value of 1 acre of class four real property described in 15-6-134(1)(a) through (1)(d)."

Section 6. Section 15-6-302, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-6-302. Property tax assistance -- rulemaking. (1) The requirements of this section must be met
for a taxpayer to qualify for property tax assistance under 15-6-305 or 15-6-311.
(2) For the property tax assistance programs provided for in 15-6-305 and 15-6-311, the residential
real property must be owned by the applicant or under contract for deed and be the primary residence as
defined in 15-6-301. The department shall make rules specifying the indicators used for determining whether a
residence is a primary residence for purposes of property tax assistance programs.
(3) An applicant's qualifying income, as defined in 15-6-301, may not exceed the threshold
established in 15-6-305 or 15-6-311 or in rules established pursuant to those sections.
(4) (a) A claim for assistance must be submitted on a form prescribed by the department.
(b) The form must contain:
(i) the qualifying income of the applicant and the applicant's spouse;
(ii) an affirmation that the applicant owns and maintains the land and improvements as the primary
residence as defined in 15-6-301;
(iii) the social security number of the applicant and of the applicant's spouse; and
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 154

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0154.2
(iv) any other information required by the department that is relevant to the applicant's eligibility.
(5) (a) An application must be filed by April 15 of the year for which assistance is first claimed.
(b) Once assistance is approved, the applicant remains eligible for property tax assistance in
subsequent years through the annual verification process defined in 15-6-301 without the need to reapply.
(c) A taxpayer shall inform the department of any change in eligibility occurring from one year to
the next.
(6) The department may verify an applicant's and an applicant's spouse's social security number
and benefits with the social security administration and the U.S. department of veterans affairs.
(7) The department must annually shall verify annually an applicant's eligibility, including the
applicant's and spouse's income, and approve, renew, or deny benefits for the current year based upon on the
findings.
(8) (a) When providing information for property tax assistance under 15-6-305 or 15-6-311,
applicants are subject to the false swearing penalties established in 45-7-202.
(b) The department may investigate the information provided in an application and an applicant's
continued eligibility.
(c) The department may request applicant verification of the primary residence.
(9) The department may address unusual circumstances of ownership and income that arise in
administering taxpayer assistance programs provided for in 15-6-305 and 15-6-311. For the disabled veteran
program provided for in 15-6-311, "unusual circumstances" includes:
(a) living expenses and income above normal and typical annual income used for funeral
expenses or medical expenses, including medical expenses related to rehabilitation expenses, nontypical
medical expenses, or major medical expenses of an immediate family member;
(b) unusual expenditures for necessary home and living expenses, such as major home repairs,
vehicle replacement, and education or career training; and
(c) any other unusual factual circumstances regarding ownership and income.
(10) A temporary stay in a nursing home or similar facility does not change a taxpayer's primary
residence for the purposes of taxpayer assistance programs provided for in 15-6-305 and 15-6-311.
(11) The department shall award property assistance under the property tax assistance program
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 154

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0154.2
that provides the greatest benefit to the taxpayer by reviewing applications and eligibility requirements, and
notify the applicant of the department's decision. Assistance may not be granted for property receiving the
intangible land value property exemption provided for in 15-6-240."

Section 7. Section 15-7-102, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-7-102. Notice of classification, market value, and taxable value to owners -- appeals. (1) (a)
Except as provided in 15-7-138, the department shall mail or provide electronically to each owner or purchaser
under contract for deed a notice that includes the land classification, market value, and taxable value of the
land and improvements owned or being purchased. A notice must be mailed or, with property owner consent,
provided electronically to the owner only if one or more of the following changes pertaining to the land or
improvements have been made since the last notice:
(i) change in ownership;
(ii) change in classification;
(iii) change in valuation; or
(iv) addition or subtraction of personal property affixed to the land.
(b) The notice must include the following for the taxpayer's informational and informal classification
and appraisal review purposes:
(i) a notice of the availability of all the property tax assistance programs available to property
taxpayers, including the intangible land value assistance program provided for in 15-6-240, the property tax
assistance programs provided for in Title 15, chapter 6, part 3, and the residential property tax credit for the
elderly provided for in 15-30-2337 through 15-30-2341, and the housing fairness property tax credit provided for
in [sections 1 through 4];
(ii) the total amount of mills levied against the property in the prior year;
(iii) the market value for the prior reappraisal cycle;
(iv) if the market value has increased by more than 10%, an explanation for the increase in
valuation;
(v) a statement that the notice is not a tax bill; and
(vi) a taxpayer option to request an informal classification and appraisal review by checking a box
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – HB 154

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0154.2
on the notice and returning it to the department.
(c) When the department uses an appraisal method that values land and improvements as a unit,
including the sales comparison approach for residential condominiums or the income approach for commercial
property, the notice must contain a combined appraised value of land and improvements.
(d) Any misinformation provided in the information required by subsection (1)(b) does not affect the
validity of the notice and may not be used as a basis for a challenge of the legality of the notice.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2)(c), the department shall assign each classification and
appraisal to the correct owner or purchaser under contract for deed and mail or provide electronically the notice
in written or electronic form, adopted by the department, containing sufficient information in a comprehensible
manner designed to fully inform the taxpayer as to the classification and appraisal of the property and of
changes over the prior tax year.
(b) The notice must advise the taxpayer that in order to be eligible for a refund of taxes from an
appeal of the classification or appraisal, the taxpayer is required to pay the taxes under protest as provided in
15-1-402.
(c) The department is not required to mail or provide electronically the notice to a new owner or
purchaser under contract for deed unless the department has received the realty transfer certificate from the
clerk and recorder as provided in 15-7-304 and has processed the certificate before the notices required by
subsection (2)(a) are mailed or provided electronically. The department shall notify the county tax appeal board
of the date of the mailing or the date when the taxpayer is informed the information is available electronically.
(3) (a) If the owner of any land and improvements is dissatisfied with the appraisal as it reflects the
market value of the property as determined by the department or with the classification of the land or
improvements, the owner may request an informal classification and appraisal review by submitting an
objection on written or electronic forms provided by the department for that purpose or by checking a box on the
notice and returning it to the department in a manner prescribed by the department.
(i) For property other than class three property described in 15-6-133, class four property
described in 15-6-134, class ten property described in 15-6-143, and centrally assessed property described in
15-23-101, the objection must be submitted within 30 days from the date on the notice.
(ii) For class three property described in 15-6-133, class four property described in 15-6-134, and
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – HB 154

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0154.2
class ten property described in 15-6-143, the objection may be made only once each valuation cycle. An
objection must be made in writing or by checking a box on the notice within 30 days from the date on the
classification and appraisal notice for a reduction in the appraised value to be considered for both years of the
2-year valuation cycle. An objection made more than 30 days from the date of the classification and appraisal
notice will be applicable only for the second year of the 2-year valuation cycle. For an objection to apply to the
second year of the valuation cycle, the taxpayer shall make the objection in writing or by checking a box on the
notice no later than June 1 of the second year of the valuation cycle or, if a classification and appraisal notice is
received in the second year of the valuation cycle, within 30 days from the date on the notice.
(iii) For centrally assessed property described in 15-23-101(2)(a), the objection must be submitted
within 20 days from the date on the notice. A taxpayer may submit an objection up to 10 days after this deadline
on request to the department.
(iv) (A) For centrally assessed property described in 15-23-101(2)(b) and (2)(c), an objection to the
valuation or classification may be made only once each valuation cycle. An objection must be made in writing
within the time period specified in subsection (3)(a)(iii) for a reduction in the appraised value to be considered
for both years of the 2-year valuation cycle. An objection made after the deadline specified in subsection
(3)(a)(iii) will be applicable only for the second year of the 2-year valuation cycle. For an objection to apply to
the second year of the valuation cycle, the taxpayer shall make the objection in writing no later than June 1 of
the second year of the valuation cycle or, if a classification and appraisal notice is received in the second year
of the valuation cycle, within the time period specified in subsection (3)(a)(iii).
(B) If a property owner has exhausted the right to object to a valuation, as provided for in
subsection (3)(a)(iv)(A), the property owner may ask the department to consider extenuating circumstances to
adjust the value of property described in 15-23-101(2)(b) or (2)(c). Occurrences that may result in an
adjustment to the value include but are not limited to extraordinary, unusual, or infrequent events that are
material in nature and of a character different from the typical or customary business operations, that are not
expected to recur frequently, and that are not normally considered in the evaluation of the operating results of a
business, including bankruptcies, acquisitions, sales of assets, or mergers.
(b) If the objection relates to residential or commercial property and the objector agrees to the
confidentiality requirements, the department shall provide to the objector, by posted mail or electronically, within
- 11 - Authorized Print Version – HB 154

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0154.2
8 weeks of submission of the objection, the following information:
(i) the methodology and sources of data used by the department in the valuation of the property;
and
(ii) if the department uses a blend of evaluations developed from various sources, the reasons that
the methodology was used.
(c) At the request of the objector or a representative of the objector, and only if the objector or
representative signs a written or electronic confidentiality agreement, the department shall provide in written or
electronic form:
(i) comparable sales data used by the department to value the property;
(ii) sales data used by the department to value residential property in the property taxpayer's
market model area; and
(iii) if the cost approach was used by the department to value residential property, the
documentation required in 15-8-111(3) regarding why the comparable sales approach was not reliable.
(d) For properties valued using the income approach as one approximation of market value, notice
must be provided that the taxpayer will be given a form to acknowledge confidentiality requirements for the
receipt of all aggregate model output that the department used in the valuation model for the property.
(e) The review must be conducted informally and is not subject to the contested case procedures
of the Montana Administrative Procedure Act. As a part of the review, the department may consider the actual
selling price of the property and other relevant information presented by the taxpayer in support of the
taxpayer's opinion as to the market value of the property. The department shall consider an independent
appraisal provided by the taxpayer if the appraisal meets standards set by the Montana board of real estate
appraisers and the appraisal was completed within 6 months of the valuation date pursuant to 15-8-201. If the
department does not use the appraisal provided by the taxpayer in conducting the appeal, the department shall
provide to the taxpayer the reason for not using the appraisal. The department shall give reasonable notice to
the taxpayer of the time and place of the review.
(f) After the review, the department shall determine the correct appraisal and classification of the
land or improvements and notify the taxpayer of its determination by mail or electronically. The department may
not determine an appraised value that is higher than the value that was the subject of the objection unless the
- 12 - Authorized Print Version – HB 154

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0154.2
reason for an increase was the result of a physical change in the property or caused by an error in the
description of the property or data available for the property that is kept by the department and used for
calculating the appraised value. In the notification, the department shall state its reasons for revising the
classification or appraisal. When the proper appraisal and classification have been determined, the land must
be classified and the improvements appraised in the manner ordered by the department.
(4) Whether a review as provided in subsection (3) is held or not, the department may not adjust
an appraisal or classification upon the taxpayer's objection unless:
(a) the taxpayer has submitted an objection on written or electronic forms provided by the
department or by checking a box on the notice; and
(b) the department has provided to the objector by mail or electronically its stated reason in writing
for making the adjustment.
(5) A taxpayer's written objection or objection made by checking a box on the notice and
supplemental information provided by a taxpayer that elects to check a box on the notice to a classification or
appraisal and the department's notification to the taxpayer of its determination and the reason for that
determination are public records. The department shall make the records available for inspection during regular
office hours.
(6) Except as provided in 15-2-302 and 15-23-102, if a property owner feels aggrieved by the
classification or appraisal made by the department after the review provided for in subsection (3), the property
owner has the right to first appeal to the county tax appeal board and then to the Montana tax appeal board,
whose findings are final subject to the right of review in the courts. The appeal to the county tax appeal board,
pursuant to 15-15-102, must be filed within 30 days from the date on the notice of the department's
determination. A county tax appeal board or the Montana tax appeal board may consider the actual selling price
of the property, independent appraisals of the property, negative property features that differentiate the subject
property from the department's comparable sales, and other relevant information presented by the taxpayer as
evidence of the market value of the property. If the county tax appeal board or the Montana tax appeal board
determines that an adjustment should be made, the department shall adjust the base value of the property in
accordance with the board's order."

- 13 - Authorized Print Version – HB 154

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0154.2
Section 8. Section 15-16-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-16-101. Treasurer to publish notice -- manner of publication. (1) Within 10 days after the
receipt of the property tax record, the county treasurer shall publish a notice specifying:
(a) that one-half of all taxes levied and assessed will be due and payable before 5 p.m. on the next
November 30 or within 30 days after the notice is postmarked and that unless paid prior to that time the amount
then due will be delinquent and will draw interest at the rate of 5/6 of 1% a month from the time of delinquency
until paid and 2% will be added to the delinquent taxes as a penalty;
(b) that one-half of all taxes levied and assessed will be due and payable on or before 5 p.m. on
the next May 31 and that unless paid prior to that time the taxes will be delinquent and will draw interest at the
rate of 5/6 of 1% a month from the time of delinquency until paid and 2% will be added to the delinquent taxes
as a penalty; and
(c) the time and place at which payment of taxes may be made.
(2) (a) The county treasurer shall send to the last-known address of each taxpayer a written notice,
postage prepaid, showing the amount of taxes and assessments due for the current year and the amount due
and delinquent for other years. The written notice must include:
(i) the taxable value of the property;
(ii) the total mill levy applied to that taxable value;
(iii) itemized city services and special improvement district assessments collected by the county;
(iv) the number of the school district in which the property is located;
(v) the amount of the total tax due itemized by mill levy that is levied as city tax, county tax, state
tax, school district tax, and other tax;
(vi) an indication of which mill levies are voted levies, including voted levies to impose a new mill
levy, to increase a mill levy that is required to be submitted to the electors, or to exceed the mill levy limit
provided for in 15-10-420;
(vii) except as provided in subsection (2)(c), an itemization of the taxes due for each mill levy and a
comparison to the amount due for each mill levy in the prior year; and
(viii) a notice of the availability of all the property tax assistance programs available to property
taxpayers, including the intangible land value assistance program provided for in 15-6-240, the property tax
- 14 - Authorized Print Version – HB 154

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0154.2
assistance programs under Title 15, chapter 6, part 3, and the residential property tax credit for the elderly
under 15-30-2337 through 15-30-2341, and the housing fairness property tax credit provided for in [sections 1
through 4].
(b) If a tax lien is attached to the property, the notice must also include, in a manner calculated to
draw attention, a statement that a tax lien is attached to the property, that failure to respond will result in loss of
property, and that the taxpayer may contact the county treasurer for complete information.
(c) The information required in subsection (2)(a)(vii) may be posted on the county treasurer's
website instead of being included on the written notice.
(3) The municipality shall, upon request of the county treasurer, provide the information to be
included under subsection (2)(a)(iii) ready for mailing.
(4) The notice in every case must be given as provided in 7-1-2121. Failure to publish or post
notices does not relieve the taxpayer from any tax liability. Any failure to give notice of the tax due for the
current year or of delinquent tax will not affect the legality of the tax.
(5) If the department revises an assessment that results in an additional tax of $5 or less, an
additional tax is not owed and a new tax bill does not need to be prepared."

Section 9. Section 15-17-125, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-17-125. Attachment of tax lien and preparation of tax lien certificate. (1) (a) The county
treasurer shall attach a tax lien no later than the first working day in August to properties on which the taxes are
delinquent and for which proper notification was given as provided in 15-17-122 and subsection (4) of this
section. Upon attachment of a tax lien, the county is the possessor of the tax lien unless the tax lien is assigned
pursuant to 15-17-323.
(b) The county treasurer may not attach a tax lien to a property on which taxes are delinquent but
for which proper notice was not given.
(2) After attaching a tax lien, the county treasurer shall prepare a tax lien certificate that must
contain:
(a) the date on which the property taxes became delinquent;
(b) the date on which a property tax lien was attached to the property;
- 15 - Authorized Print Version – HB 154

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0154.2
(c) the name and address of record of the person to whom the taxes were assessed;
(d) a description of the property on which the taxes were assessed;
(e) a separate listing of the amount of the delinquent taxes, penalties, interest, and costs;
(f) a statement that the tax lien certificate represents a lien on the property that may lead to the
issuance of a tax deed for the property;
(g) a statement specifying the date on which the county or an assignee will be entitled to a tax
deed; and
(h) an identification number corresponding to the tax lien certificate.
(3) The tax lien certificate must be signed by the county treasurer. A copy of the tax lien certificate
must be filed by the treasurer in the office of the county clerk. A copy of the tax lien certificate must also be
mailed to the person to whom the taxes were assessed, at the address of record, together with a notice that the
person may contact the county treasurer for further information on property tax liens.
(4) Prior to attaching a tax lien to the property, the county treasurer shall send notice of the
pending attachment of a tax lien to the person to whom the property was assessed. The notice must include the
information listed in subsection (2), state that the tax lien may be assigned to a third party, and provide notice of
the availability of all the property tax assistance programs available to property taxpayers, including the
property tax assistance programs under Title 15, chapter 6, part 3, and the residential property tax credit for the
elderly under 15-30-2337 through 15-30-2341, and the housing fairness property tax credit provided for in
[sections 1 through 4]. The notice must have been mailed at least 2 weeks prior to the date on which the county
treasurer attaches the tax lien.
(5) The county treasurer shall file the tax lien certificate with the county clerk and recorder."

Section 10. Section 15-30-2303, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-30-2303. Tax credits subject to review by interim committee. (1) The following tax credits
must be reviewed during the biennium commencing July 1, 2021, and during each biennium commencing 8
years thereafter:
(a) the credit for donations to innovative educational programs provided for in 15-30-2334, 15-30-
3110, and 15-31-158;
- 16 - Authorized Print Version – HB 154

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0154.2
(b) the credit for donations to a student scholarship organization provided for in 15-30-2335, 15-
30-3111, and 15-31-159; and
(c) the adoption tax credit provided for in 15-30-2321.
(2) The following tax credits must be reviewed during the biennium commencing July 1, 2023, and
during each biennium commencing 8 years thereafter:
(a) the credit for infrastructure use fees provided for in 17-6-316;
(b) the credit for contributions to a qualified endowment provided for in 15-30-2327 through 15-30-
2329, 15-31-161, and 15-31-162;
(c) the credit for property to recycle or manufacture using recycled material provided for in Title 15,
chapter 32, part 6; and
(d) the credit for preservation of historic buildings provided for in 15-30-2342 and 15-31-151.
(3) The following tax credits must be reviewed during the biennium commencing July 1, 2025, and
during each biennium commencing 8 years thereafter:
(a) the residential property tax credit for the elderly provided for in 15-30-2337 through 15-30-
2341;
(b) the housing fairness property tax credit provided for in [sections 1 through 4];
(b)(c) the credit for unlocking state lands provided for in 15-30-2380;
(c)(d) the job growth incentive tax credit provided for in 15-30-2361 and 15-31-175; and
(d)(e) the credit for trades education and training provided for in 15-30-2359 and 15-31-174.
(4) The following tax credits must be reviewed during the biennium commencing July 1, 2027, and
during each biennium commencing 8 years thereafter:
(a) the credit for hiring a registered apprentice or veteran apprentice provided for in 15-30-2357
and 15-31-173;
(b) the earned income tax credit provided for in 15-30-2318;
(c) the media production and postproduction credits provided for in 15-31-1007 and 15-31-1009;
and
(d) the credit for contractor's gross receipts provided for in 15-50-207.
(5) The revenue interim committee shall review the tax credits scheduled for review and make
- 17 - Authorized Print Version – HB 154

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0154.2
recommendations in accordance with 5-11-210 at the conclusion of the full review to the legislature about
whether to eliminate or revise the credits. The committee shall also review any tax credit with an expiration date
or termination date that is not listed in this section in the biennium before the credit is scheduled to expire or
terminate.
(6) The revenue interim committee shall review the credits using the following criteria:
(a) whether the credit changes taxpayer decisions, including whether the credit rewards decisions
that may have been made regardless of the existence of the tax credit;
(b) to what extent the credit benefits some taxpayers at the expense of other taxpayers;
(c) whether the credit has out-of-state beneficiaries;
(d) the timing of costs and benefits of the credit and how long the credit is effective;
(e) any adverse impacts of the credit or its elimination and whether the benefits of continuance or
elimination outweigh adverse impacts; and
(f) the extent to which benefits of the credit affect the larger economy. (Subsection (3)(c)
terminates December 31, 2028--sec. 4, Ch. 391, L. 2023; subsection (3)(d) terminates December 31, 2028--
sec. 2, Ch. 576, L. 2023; subsection (1)(c) terminates December 31, 2031--sec. 6, Ch. 493, L. 2023.)"

Section 11. Section 15-30-2341, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-30-2341. Residential property tax credit for elderly -- limitations -- denial of claim. (1) Only
one claimant per household in a claim period under the provisions of 15-30-2337 through 15-30-2341 is entitled
to relief.
(2) A taxpayer may not claim the housing fairness property tax credit provided for in [sections 1
through 4] and the residential property tax credit for the elderly.
(2)(3) Except as provided in subsection (3)(4), a claim for relief may not be allowed for any portion of
property taxes billed or rent-equivalent taxes paid that is derived from a public rent or tax subsidy program.
(3)(4) Except for dwellings rented from a county or municipal housing authority, a claim for relief may
not be allowed on rented lands or rented dwellings that are not subject to Montana property taxes during the
claim period.
(4)(5) A person filing a false or fraudulent claim under the provisions of 15-30-2337 through 15-30-
- 18 - Authorized Print Version – HB 154

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0154.2
2341 must be charged with the offense of unsworn falsification to authorities pursuant to 45-7-203. If a false or
fraudulent claim has been paid, the amount paid, penalties, and interest may be recovered as provided in 15-1-
216."

NEW SECTION. Section 12. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 4] are intended to be
codified as an integral part of Title 15, chapter 30, and the provisions of Title 15, chapter 30, apply to [sections
1 through 4].

NEW SECTION. Section 13. Effective date. [This act] is effective January 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Section 14. Applicability. [Sections 1 through 4] apply to housing fairness property
tax credits claimed in income tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, for property taxes billed after
December 31, 2025.
- END -
- 19 - Authorized Print Version – HB 154